Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 3. Administration of Plans.

Sec. 21.55.200.
Selection of a plan administrator.

The board shall develop bid specifications and select a plan administrator through a competitive bidding process. The selection of the plan administrator shall be based upon criteria including the plan administrator’s proven ability to handle health insurance coverage for individuals, efficient claim paying capacity, the estimate of total charges for administering the plan, the plan administrator’s ability to apply effective cost containment programs and procedures and to administer the plan in a cost efficient manner, and the financial condition and stability of the plan administrator.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 10 ch 31 SLA 1999)

Sec. 21.55.210.
Duties of plan administrator.

The plan administrator shall perform the administrative and claims payment functions required by this section. The plan administrator shall provide these services for a period specified in the contract between the association and the plan administrator subject to the terms, conditions, and limitations of the contract between the association and the plan administrator. At least six months before the expiration of each contract period, the board shall invite eligible entities, including the plan administrator, to submit bids to serve as the plan administrator. The board shall follow the provisions of this subsection in selecting a plan administrator for the subsequent contract period.

The plan administrator shall provide to all eligible persons enrolled in a state plan an individual policy setting out a statement of the insurance protection to which the person is entitled, with whom claims are to be filed, and to whom benefits are payable. The policy must indicate that coverage was obtained through the association.

The plan administrator shall submit to the board and the director on a regular basis a report on the operation of the state plans. The board shall determine the specific information to be contained in the report and that information shall be specified in the contract between the association and the plan administrator.

The plan administrator shall pay claims and shall indicate when a claim is paid under a state plan. A claim payment must include a telephone number that can be used for inquiries regarding the claim.

The plan administrator shall

be reimbursed from the state plan receipts for services rendered in connection with administering the plan; and

at all times when carrying out its duties under this chapter be considered an agent of the association.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 11 ch 31 SLA 1999)

Sec. 21.55.220.
Operation of the plan.

Upon notification of eligibility under AS

21.55.320

, a person may enroll in a state plan by payment of the appropriate state plan premium to the plan administrator.

[Repealed, § 29 ch 30 SLA 2009.]

Each member of the association shall share the losses due to claims expenses of the state plans issued or approved for issuance by the association; each member of the association shall share the losses of a reinsurance program established by regulations adopted under AS

21.55.400

reinsuring residents who are high risks; and each member of the association shall share in the operating and administrative expenses incurred or estimated to be incurred by the association incident to the conduct of its affairs. Claims expenses of the state plan that exceed the premium payments allocated to the payment of benefits shall be the liability of the members. Each member shall share in the claims expense of the state plans, the operating and administrative expenses of the association, and the losses of a reinsurance program established by regulations adopted under AS

21.55.400

reinsuring residents who are high risks, in an amount equal to the ratio of the member’s total major medical premiums, received from or on behalf of state residents, as divided by the total major medical premiums received by all members from or on behalf of state residents, as determined by the director.

The board shall make an annual determination of each member’s liability, if any, and may make an annual fiscal year end assessment if necessary. The board may also provide for interim assessments against the members as may be necessary to assure the financial capability of the association in meeting the incurred or estimated claims expenses of the state plans and operating and administrative expenses of the association until the association’s next annual fiscal year end assessment. Payment of an assessment is due within 30 days after receipt by a member of written notice of a fiscal year end or interim assessment. A member who fails to pay a fiscal year end or interim assessment as required in this subsection (1) shall pay a civil penalty to the director in the amount of $100 for each day the member fails to pay the required assessment, and (2) may have the member’s certificate of authority revoked by the director. A member that ceases to do business in the state remains liable for assessments until the board determines under (c) of this section that no assessment is due. The board may decline to levy an assessment against a member if the assessment would be minimal. Assessments paid by a member are a general expense of the member.

Net gains, if any, from the operation of the state plans shall be held at interest and used by the association to offset future losses due to claims expenses of a state plan or allocated to reduce state plan premiums.

A member may offset 50 percent of the amount of the assessment under this section as a premium tax credit reducing the premium tax payable by the member under AS

21.09.210

. The offset shall apply to the tax levied for the calendar year following an annual determination of each member’s liability under (d) of this section. The offset may not reduce the premium tax payable by a member to less than zero or create a premium tax credit for the member. An unused offset may be carried over to the immediately following calendar year. An offset made under this subsection is not subject to AS

21.09.270

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am §§ 12 — 14 ch 31 SLA 1999; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 108 SLA 2006; am § 9 ch 38 SLA 2007; am § 29 ch 30 SLA 2009; am § 4 ch 52 SLA 2012)